ja: 指示フォーマット: アプリベースの手順; デジタルダウンロード (PDF); 説明書なし; オンラインガイド/記事; オンライン動画チュートリアル; 印刷された説明書; その他
sl-SI: Oblika navodil: Navodila v aplikaciji; Digitalni prenos (PDF); Navodila niso priložena; Spletni vodnik/članek; Spletna videovadnica; Natisnjena navodila; Drugo
sv: Instruktionsformat: Appbaserade instruktioner; Digital nedladdning (PDF); Inga instruktioner ingår; Onlineguide/-artikel; Videohandledning online; Tryckta instruktioner; Övrigt
vi: Định dạng hướng dẫn: Hướng dẫn trên ứng dụng; Tải xuống kỹ thuật số (PDF); Không kèm theo hướng dẫn; Bài viết/hướng dẫn trực tuyến; Video hướng dẫn trực tuyến; Hướng dẫn in; Khác
pt-BR: Formato das instruções: Instruções pelo app; Download digital (PDF); Nenhuma instrução incluída; Guia/artigo online; Tutorial em vídeo online; Instruções impressas; Outras
nb: Instruksjonsformat: App-baserte instruksjoner; Digital nedlasting (PDF); Ingen instruksjoner inkludert; Nettbasert guide/artikkel; Nettbasert video-opplæring; Trykte instruksjoner; Annet
nl: Instructie formaat: App-gebaseerde instructies; Digitale download (pdf); Geen instructies inbegrepen; Online gids/artikel; Online videotutorial; Gedrukte instructies; Overige
hr-HR: Format upute: Upute putem aplikacije; Digitalno preuzimanje (PDF); Bez uputa; Mrežni vodič / članak; Mrežni videovodič; Tiskane upute; Ostalo
zh-TW: 說明書格式: 應用程式說明; 數位下載 (PDF); 不含說明書; 線上指南/文章; 線上影片教學; 印刷說明書; 其他
tr: Talimat formatı: Uygulama tabanlı talimatlar; Dijital indirme (PDF); Talimatlar dahil değildir; Online rehber/makale; Online videolu eğitim; Basılı talimatlar; Diğer
zh-CN: 说明格式: App 内说明; 数字下载 (PDF); 不含说明书; 在线指南/文章; 在线视频教程; 纸质版说明书; 其他
cs: Formát pokynů: Návod v aplikaci; Digitální verze ke stažení (PDF); Bez návodu k použití; Online průvodce/článek; Online video tutoriál; Tištěný návod; Jiné
ko: 설명서 형식: 앱 기반 사용 설명서; 디지털 다운로드(PDF); 사용 설명서 미포함; 온라인 가이드/문서; 온라인 비디오 튜토리얼; 인쇄된 사용 설명서; 기타
da: Instruktionsformat: App-baserede instruktioner; Digital download (PDF); Ingen instruktioner medfølger; Onlinevejledning/-artikel; Online videovejledning; Trykte instruktioner; Andet
lt-LT: Instrukcijos formatas: Instrukcijos programėlėje; Skaitmeninis atsisiuntimas (PDF); Instrukcijos nepridedamos; Internetinis vadovas / straipsnis; Internetinė vaizdo mokomoji medžiaga; Spausdintos instrukcijos; Kita
en: Instruction format: App-based instructions; Digital download (PDF); No instructions included; Online guide/article; Online video tutorial; Printed instructions; Other
hu: Útmutató formátuma: Alkalmazásalapú útmutató; Digitálisan letölthető (PDF); Nincs mellékelt útmutató; Online útmutató/cikk; Online videós útmutató; Nyomtatott útmutató; Egyéb
de: Format der Anleitung: App-basierte Anleitung; Digitaler Download (PDF); Keine Anleitung enthalten; Online-Leitfaden/Artikel; Online-Video-Tutorial; Gedruckte Anleitung; Sonstige
it: Formato delle istruzioni: Istruzioni basate su app; Download digitale (PDF); Nessuna istruzione inclusa; Guida/articolo online; Video tutorial online; Istruzioni stampate; Altro
pl: Format instrukcji: Instrukcje w aplikacji; Do pobrania (PDF); Brak instrukcji w zestawie; Przewodnik/artykuł online; Samouczek wideo online; Drukowane instrukcje; Inne
fr: Format des instructions: Instructions sur application; Téléchargement numérique (PDF); Aucune instruction incluse; Guide/article en ligne; Tutoriel vidéo en ligne; Instructions imprimées; Autre
ru: Формат инструкций: Инструкция в приложении; Цифровая загрузка (PDF); Инструкция не включена; Онлайн-руководство/статья; Онлайн видеоруководство; Печатная инструкция; Другое
sk-SK: Formát pokynov: Pokyny v aplikácii; Stiahnutie digitálnej verzie (PDF); Bez priložených pokynov; Online sprievodca/článok; Online video tutoriál; Vytlačené pokyny; Iné
th: รูปแบบคำแนะนำ: คำแนะนำผ่านแอป; ดาวน์โหลดดิจิทัล (PDF); ไม่มีคำแนะนำให้; คู่มือ/บทความออนไลน์; บทแนะนำการใช้งานวิดีโอออนไลน์; คำแนะนำแบบพิมพ์; อื่นๆ
es: Formato de instrucciones: Instrucciones en la aplicación; Descarga digital (PDF); No incluye instrucciones; Guía/artículo online; Video tutorial online; Instrucciones impresas; Otro
el: Μορφή οδηγιών: Οδηγίες μέσω εφαρμογής; Ψηφιακή λήψη (PDF); Δεν περιλαμβάνονται οδηγίες; Διαδικτυακός οδηγός/άρθρο; Διαδικτυακός οδηγός εκμάθησης (βίντεο); Έντυπες οδηγίες; Άλλο
fi: Ohjeen muoto: Sovelluspohjaiset ohjeet; Digitaalinen lataus (PDF); Ei sisällä ohjeita; Verkko-opas/-artikkeli; Verkkovideotutoriaali; Painetut ohjeet; Muu
pt-PT: Formato de instruções: Instruções na aplicação; Transferência digital (PDF); Sem instruções incluídas; Guia/artigo online; Tutorial de vídeo online; Instruções impressas; Outro
ro-RO: Formatul instrucțiunilor: Instrucțiuni în aplicație; Descărcare digitală (PDF); Fără instrucțiuni incluse; Ghid/Articol online; Tutorial video online; Instrucțiuni tipărite; Altele
bg-BG: Формат на инструкциите: Инструкции в приложение; Дигитално изтегляне (PDF); Не са включени инструкции; Онлайн ръководство/статия; Онлайн видео обучение; Отпечатани инструкции; Други